Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202085-506
Nebraska National Guard; member; certificate as to guard performance; tuition credit.

It shall be the responsibility of the individual member of the Nebraska National Guard to obtain a certificate from such member's commanding officer attesting as to the satisfactory guard performance of such member and to present the same to the educational institution in order to obtain tuition credit. Such certification shall be accomplished at the time of enrollment for each semester or academic term for which tuition credit is requested. Such certification shall include a signed agreement by the individual to serve in the National Guard for a minimum of three years from the date of certification.

Laws 1974, LB 982, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 564, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 931, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB450, § 3.